Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 7
Regulation of Mines

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

[Reserved]

Subchapter 2
— State Mine Inspector

Effective Dates.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 17: effective 90 days after passage.

Acts 1917, No. 130, § 9: July 1, 1917. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the immediate protection and preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared, and all laws and parts of laws in conflict herewith are hereby repealed, and this act shall take effect from and after July first, 1917.”

Acts 1923, No. 120, § 3: July 1, 1923.

Acts 1937, No. 233, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1949, No. 268, § 22: effective on passage.

Acts 1983, No. 532, § 2: Mar. 18, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law relating to qualifications for State Mine Inspector is confusing and could be interpreted to impose unreasonable and unnecessary restrictions on the position of State Mine Inspector; that this Act is designed to clarify and simplify the qualifications for State Mine Inspector and to preserve those qualifications which are necessary to assure that the State Mine Inspector is a highly qualified person, and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-7-201. Act cumulative.

This act shall not repeal any of the mining laws of the state, except wherein it specifically conflicts, but shall be cumulative to all mining laws in force prior to July 1, 1917.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 130, § 8, p. 683; C. & M. Dig., § 7258; Pope's Dig., § 9314; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-412.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1917, No. 130, codified as §§ 11-7-201 — 11-7-205, 11-7-208, 11-7-211.

11-7-202. Penalties.

Any person who shall willfully obstruct or hinder the mine inspector in the discharge of his or her duties and every owner, lessee, agent, or manager of a mine who refuses or neglects to furnish the State Mine Inspector the means necessary for making entry, inspection, examination, or inquiry under the mining laws of this state shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

Upon conviction, the person shall be punished as provided in subsection (c) of this section.

Should the mine inspector willfully fail or refuse to perform any of the duties required under the provisions of the mining laws of this state, he or she shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

Upon conviction, he or she shall be fined in a sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and, upon a second conviction for such failure or refusal, shall be removed from office by the Governor and his or her successor appointed within thirty (30) days from the date of removal.

Any owner, agent, lessee, or other person convicted of the violation of any of the provisions of the mining laws of this state or failing in any manner to comply therewith shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

Upon conviction, the person shall be fined in any sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) except where provisions of the mining laws otherwise provide penalties.

Each day any violation or failure shall continue on the part of any owner, agent, lessee, or other person shall be deemed a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 130, § 6, p. 683; C. & M. Dig., § 7256; Pope's Dig., § 9312; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-410.

11-7-203. Prosecution of violations.

It shall be and is made the duty of the prosecuting attorney in the district wherein the State Mine Inspector shall arrest or cause to be arrested any person violating the provisions of the mining laws of the state to at once take charge of and prosecute the person with reasonable diligence.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 130, § 7, p. 683; C. & M. Dig., § 7257; Pope's Dig., § 9313; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-411.

11-7-204. Appointment, term, and qualifications.

The Governor shall appoint a State Mine Inspector, who shall hold office for a term of two (2) years, beginning on July 1 of every odd-numbered year and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

The mine inspector shall be a citizen of good repute and temperate habits, and he or she must have had five (5) years' experience as a practical miner.

While holding office, the mine inspector shall not be connected with or engaged, directly or indirectly, as owner, operator, agent, or director of any coal mine or other mining interest.

The Governor and the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing shall have the power to remove a mine inspector for cause.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her office and within twenty (20) days after his or her appointment, the mine inspector shall make and execute a bond to the State of Arkansas, with one (1) or more sufficient sureties, in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000), conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties, which shall be approved by the Governor.

When the bond is so approved, he or she shall also take the oath of office prescribed by the Arkansas Constitution.

In the event that the mine inspector shall fail to make and execute the bond within the time prescribed by subdivision (d)(1) of this section, his or her appointment shall be declared void.

It is made the duty of the Governor to appoint and have qualified a proper person in his or her stead, as contemplated by the provisions of this section.

The State Mine Inspector shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing and shall be an employee of the Department of Labor and Licensing.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 130, §§ 1, 2, p. 683; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7249, 7250; Acts 1923, No. 120, § 1; 1937, No. 233, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 9305, 9306; Acts 1983, No. 532, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 52-401, 52-402; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§
5344, 5345.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subsection (d) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials, and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1937, No. 233, § 2 provided that the act would not be construed as repealing or modifying any section or provision of the mining laws then in effect, except where they were in conflict, but would be cumulative thereto.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “and the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing” for “alone” in (c); and added (e).

Cross References.

Oath of officers, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 20.

11-7-205. Office, staff, and compensation.

The State Mine Inspector shall have an office, which may be located in Fort Smith, and shall safely keep all records, papers, documents, and other property pertaining to or coming into his or her hands by virtue of his or her office and deliver them to his or her successor.

The mine inspector shall be allowed the salary, expenses, and office and clerical assistance as provided by law.

Salaries and expenses shall be paid out of the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund upon vouchers issued by the mine inspector, pursuant to appropriations duly made.

The Auditor of State shall issue the warrants on the voucher, and the Treasurer of State shall pay the same.

The mine inspector, in addition to his or her salary and other expenses, shall be allowed one (1) stenographer, who shall act as clerk for the mine inspector and who shall receive a salary to be paid out of the State Treasury, as other salaries are paid.

He or she shall also be allowed for office expenses, in keeping and maintaining his or her office, a sum not to exceed the sum of four hundred fifty dollars ($450) per annum, to be paid out of the State Treasury, as other expenses of his or her office are paid.

He or she shall also be allowed all necessary postage, stationery, and other expenses of a similar character necessary for the transaction of the business of the office.

In addition to his or her salary and other expenses provided for in this section, he or she shall be allowed necessary traveling expenses while in the performance of the duties of the office, which shall not exceed the sum of one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) per annum.

The salary and expenses shall be paid as in the case of other state officers.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 130, §§ 1, 3, p. 683; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7249, 7251; Acts 1923, No. 120, §§ 1, 2; 1937, No. 233, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 9305, 9307; Acts 1943, No. 413, § 2; 1983, No. 532, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 52-401, 52-403, 52-404; Acts 2003, No. 461, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

As to cumulative effect of Acts 1937, No. 233, see Publisher's Notes to § 11-7-204.

11-7-206. State Mine Inspector — Powers and duties.

In addition to the duties imposed upon him or her by law, the State Mine Inspector shall:

Recommend to the various operators of coal mines throughout the state all safety rules that he or she shall deem advisable; and

Investigate the necessity and feasibility of purchasing and maintaining safety, first aid, rescue, or recovery equipment that he or she shall find feasible and necessary.

If he or she shall find the purchase and maintenance of the above-described equipment feasible and necessary, he or she is authorized to purchase and maintain the equipment after the legislative appropriation of necessary funds from the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund, as directed by the appropriation, and the expenses thereof shall be paid in the same manner as the items provided for in § 11-7-205(b) are directed to be paid.

All equipment as above described must be such that it will be adaptable for use in and will be available for use in any and all coal mines in the State of Arkansas.

In his or her annual report, the mine inspector shall:

Enumerate all recommendations that he or she has made for safety measures and the result thereof; and

Recommend to each regular session of the General Assembly the measures as he or she deems necessary for the promotion of safety in coal mines.

He or she shall also request appropriations of all funds necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section and § 11-7-205.

History.

Acts 1943, No. 413, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-406; Acts 2009, No. 962, § 28; 2011, No. 980, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 773.

Publisher's Notes.

Act 1939, No. 101, § 1, provided that all statutes in force prior to February 17, 1939, which regulated coal mines or fixed the duties and jurisdiction of the state mine inspector should apply to all coal mines and their operators, irrespective of the number of persons employed in the mine.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment subdivided part of former (c) as (c)(1) and (2); and deleted “in the report, he or she shall” at the beginning of (c)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(1).

11-7-207. Assistant State Mine Inspector.

There is created the office of Assistant State Mine Inspector.

His or her term of office shall be for a period of two (2) years, to run coextensively with the term of the State Mine Inspector and until his or her successor has been appointed and qualified.

He or she shall be appointed by the Governor and work under the direction of the State Mine Inspector.

He or she may be removed by the Governor for neglect of duty or for any other reasonable cause.

He or she shall have been a resident of the State of Arkansas for the number of years and possess the same qualifications as are required of the State Mine Inspector.

Before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties as Assistant State Mine Inspector, he or she shall take and subscribe to the oath of office prescribed by law for the State Mine Inspector and shall execute a bond to the State of Arkansas, with approved security, in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000), conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties as such official.

The bond shall be approved as in the case of the State Mine Inspector and, when so approved, shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

The Assistant State Mine Inspector shall report to the State Mine Inspector and shall be an employee of the Department of Labor and Licensing.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 268, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-414; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5346.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of the bond provisions of subsection (f) was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials, and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added (g).

11-7-208. Inspection of mines.

The State Mine Inspector shall devote his or her entire time to the duties of the office.

It shall be the duty of the mine inspector to examine all mines as often as necessary and not less often than once every three (3) months.

The employees of any mine, as contemplated by the mining laws of this state, shall have authority to call the mine inspector at any time in cases of emergency for the enforcement of the mining laws of this state.

Inspections shall be made, and the mine inspector shall keep a record of inspections, which shall be included in his annual report to the Governor, of:

The works and machinery used or operated by any mine;

The state and condition of the mines as to ventilation, circulation, and condition of the air, drainage, and the number of accidents, injuries, or deaths occurring in or about the mine, the number of persons employed, and the extent to which the laws relating to mines and mining are observed; and

The progress made in improvements for the safety and health sought to be obtained by the provisions of the mining laws of this state, together with all other such facts and information of public interest concerning the conditions of mine development and progress in this state as may be deemed useful and proper.

Should the mine inspector find any violations of the mining laws of this state by any owner, lessee, or agent in charge of any mine, notice shall immediately be given to the owner, lessee, or agent in charge of the mine of the neglect or violation thereof, and, unless it is rectified within a reasonable time, the mine inspector shall institute a prosecution under the laws of the state.

If the mine inspector finds any matter, thing, or practice in or connected with a mine to be dangerous or defective, which makes it unsafe for persons employed therein, notice in writing to the owner, lessee, or agent of the dangerous or unsafe condition shall be given, and the condition shall be remedied by the owner, lessee, or agent without unnecessary delay.

For the purpose of making the inspection and examination as contemplated by this section, the mine inspector shall have the right to enter any mine at any reasonable time, by day or night, but in such manner as shall not necessarily obstruct the workings of the mine.

The owner, lessee, or agent is required to furnish the means necessary for the entry and inspection.

The inspection and examination, as contemplated by this section, shall extend to all coal mines where the mines are operated by shaft, slope, or drift.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 130, § 4, p. 683; C. & M. Dig., § 7252; Pope's Dig., § 9308; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-405.

11-7-209. Owner, agent, or operator to facilitate inspections — Failure to comply.

The owner, agent, or operator of a mine is required to furnish all necessary facilities for entering and making the examinations and inspection, and, if the owner, agent, or operator refuses to permit the inspection or to furnish the necessary facilities for entering and making the examinations and inspection, the inspector shall file his or her affidavit, setting forth the refusal, before the judge of the circuit court in the county in which the mine is located.

The judge of the court is granted the power to issue an order commanding the owner, agent, or operator to appear before the judge in chambers or before the circuit court to show cause why he or she refuses to permit the inspection or furnish the necessary facilities for entering and making the examination.

Upon hearing, the judge of the court shall have the power to fine the agent, owner, or operator in any sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 10, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., § 7253; Pope's Dig., § 9309; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-407.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be partially superseded by § 11-7-202.

11-7-210. Action to enjoin unsafe working conditions.

If the inspector shall, after examination of any mine and the works and machinery pertaining thereto, find the mine worked contrary to the provisions of this act or unsafe for the workmen employed therein, the inspector shall file a complaint before the judge of the circuit court in vacation or the circuit court when in session, in the name of the state, without cost or bond, showing that the owner, agent, or operator has failed to comply with the provisions of this act.

The court or judge, after hearing the cause, shall, if satisfied the law has not been complied with, restrain or enjoin the owner, agent, or operator from operating the mine until the law is complied with.

In all proceedings before the court or judge, the owner, agent, or operator shall have two (2) days' notice of the intended application for restraining order.

The judge or the court shall hear the complaint on affidavits or other testimony that may be offered in support, as well as in opposition thereto, and, if sufficient cause appear, the court, or judge in vacation, by order shall prohibit the further working of any mine in which persons may not be safely employed, or which is worked contrary to the provisions of this act, until the mine has been made safe and the requirements of this act shall have been complied with.

The court shall award such costs in the proceedings as may be just, but any proceedings so commenced shall be without prejudice to any other remedy permitted by law for enforcing the provisions of this act.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 11, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., § 7254; Pope's Dig., § 9310; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-408.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1893, No. 125, codified as §§ 11-7-209, 11-7-210, 11-7-301 — 11-7-305, 11-7-308, 11-7-309 — 11-7-311, 11-7-317, 11-7-318, 15-59-111 [repealed].

11-7-211. Authority to arrest violators or clear mine — Injunctive relief for owner.

The State Mine Inspector is empowered concurrently with the sheriffs and constables throughout the state to make arrests for any violations of the mining laws of this state, but he or she shall make no arrest until after notice has been given as provided in this act.

Where, in the opinion of the mine inspector, there is imminent danger to the life or health of the miners or employees in the mine, the mine inspector shall at once notify the person in charge of or operating the mine in which the dangerous condition exists to immediately remove the danger. On failure to remove the dangerous condition without unnecessary delay, the mine inspector shall order the mine or dangerous portion thereof cleared of all persons except those necessary to remove or remedy the dangerous condition.

Upon the clearing of any mine of persons employed therein, as provided in this subsection, any owner, lessee, or agent in charge of or operating the mine may apply to the circuit court within whose jurisdiction the mine lies for a writ of injunction to enjoin the mine inspector from continuing the prevention of the operation of the mine. Whereupon, the judge of the court, either in term or vacation, shall at once proceed to hear and determine the case, and if the cause appears to be sufficient after hearing the parties and their evidence, as in like cases, the judge shall sustain or overrule the mine inspector.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 130, § 5, p. 683; C. & M. Dig., § 7255; Pope's Dig., § 9311; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-409.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 11-7-201.

Subchapter 3
— Regulation of Operation

Publisher's Notes.

Act 1939, No. 101, § 1, provided that all statutes in force prior to February 17, 1939, which regulated coal mines or fixed the duties and jurisdiction of the state mine inspector should apply to all coal mines and their operators, irrespective of the number of persons employed in the mine.

Cross References.

Mechanics' and materialmen's liens on mines, § 18-44-101 et seq.

Safety of miners, Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 18.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 17: effective 90 days after passage.

Acts 1905, No. 225, § 19: effective 20 days after passage.

Acts 1919, No. 134, § 7: approved Feb. 27, 1919. Emergency clause provided: “That all laws and parts of laws in conflict herewith be and the same are hereby repealed, and this Act being necessary for the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared, and this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1919, No. 686, §§ 2, 3: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Apr. 5, 1919.

Acts 1921, No. 100, § 3: effective 90 days after passage.

Acts 1927, No. 58, § 2: effective 90 days after passage. Became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 2, 1927.

Acts 1937, No. 116, § 7: approved Feb. 23, 1937. Emergency clause provided: “Many employees of coal mines being in constant fear of not receiving their wages, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1949, No. 268, § 22: effective on passage and approval.

Acts 1957, No. 338, § 2: approved Mar. 27, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “Many employees of coal mines being in constant fear of not receiving their wages, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

11-7-301. Penalty for endangering mine or miners.

Any miner, workman, or other person who shall knowingly injure any water gauge, barometer, air course, or brattice or shall obstruct or throw open any airway, or carry any open flame lamp, or matches, into any mine or shall handle or disturb any part of the machinery of the hoisting engine or open a door to a mine, and not have the door closed again, whereby danger is produced, either to the mine or to those who work therein, who shall enter any part of the mine against caution, who shall disobey any order given in pursuance of this chapter, or who shall do any willful act whereby the lives and health of the persons working in the mine, or the security of the mine or miners or the machinery thereof is endangered, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

Upon conviction, the miner, worker, or other person shall be punished by a fine or imprisonment at the discretion of the court or jury hearing the case.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 13, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., § 7270; Pope's Dig., § 9326; Acts 1949, No. 268, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-619.

11-7-302. Right of action for death or injury.

For any injury to persons or property occasioned by willful violation of this chapter or willful failure to comply with any of its provisions, a right of action shall accrue to any party injured for any direct damages sustained thereby.

Should death ensue from any injury, a cause of action shall survive in favor first of the widow and minor children of the deceased, and if there is no widow nor minor children, then in favor of the father, then the mother, and then the brothers and sisters and their descendants.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 12, p. 213; 1905, No. 225, § 4, p. 567; C. & M. Dig., § 7269; Pope's Dig., § 9325; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-618.

Cross References.

Liability for injuries to employees, fellow servant doctrine abolished, § 11-8-109.

11-7-303. Map or plan of mine.

The owner, agent, or operator of each and every coal mine in this state shall make, or cause to be made, an accurate and correct map or plan of the entire workings of the mine and every vein or deposit thereof showing the general inclination of the strata, together with any material deflections in the workings and the boundary lines of the area belonging to the mine, and deposit a true copy of the map or plan with the clerk of the county court of the county wherein the mine or any part thereof may be located.

The map or plan shall be so deposited during the period from January 1 to June 1 of each and every year, and the owner, agent, or operator shall furnish the clerk and State Mine Inspector with a sworn statement and further map or plan of the progress of the workings of the mine from the date of the last survey reported up to the making of same, and the mine inspector shall correct his or her map or plan in accordance therewith.

When any mine is worked out or abandoned, that fact shall be reported to the mine inspector without delay, and the map or plan in the office of the clerk aforesaid shall be corrected and verified to conform to the facts then existing.

All mine maps or plans must show the location of doors, overcast or air bridges, and the direction that all air currents are traveling shall be indicated by arrows.

The clerk of the county court of the county in which mines are located shall file and safely keep all maps or plans of any mine, deposited in his or her office, and they shall be recorded as maps and plans of town sites are now recorded.

The mine inspector shall send maps and plans of mines in his or her possession to the Secretary of State for safekeeping at the end of every two (2) years, during the month of July. The mine maps and plans shall be kept in a vault for this special purpose for the guidance of anyone interested therein.

The owner, agent, or operator of any mine neglecting, failing, or refusing to furnish the mine inspector and county clerk a statement, map, or plan or addition thereto at the time and in the manner provided in subsection (a) of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction shall be fined in any sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Each day that the neglect, failure, or refusal continues shall constitute a separate offense.

This penalty shall be in addition to the rights conferred upon the mine inspector by law to have the maps or plans made at the expense of the owner, agent, or operator.

Whenever the owner, agent, or operator of any mine shall neglect, fail, or refuse to furnish the mine inspector and clerk, as provided in subsection (a) of this section, with a statement, map, or plan or additions thereto, at the time and in the manner therein provided, the mine inspector is authorized to cause an accurate map or plan of the workings of the mine to be made at the expense of the owner, agent, or operator, and the cost thereof may be recovered by the mine inspector from the owner, agent, or operator.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, §§ 1, 2, p. 213; 1905, No. 225, § 1, p. 567; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7260, 7261; Acts 1921, No. 100, § 1; 1927, No. 58, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 9316, 9317; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 52-601, 52-602.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1921, No. 100, § 2, provided that the act would not be construed as repealing any law then in effect except where the law was in direct conflict with the act, and the act would be cumulative to existing laws regulating mines.

11-7-304. Mine openings and escapeways.

Every underground mine shall have at least two (2) separate surface openings.

Main slope and drift openings shall be separated by at least twenty-five feet (25') of natural ground in all mines opened after June 9, 1949.

New shafts and partitions therein, made after June 9, 1949, shall be fireproof.

Buntons and guides may be of wood.

Mine openings at isolated locations, where there is danger of fire entering the mine, shall have adequate protection against surface fires entering the mine.

Not more than twenty (20) persons shall be allowed at any one (1) time in the mine until a connection has been made between the two (2) mine openings, and work shall be prosecuted with reasonable diligence. When only one (1) opening is available, owing to final mining of pillars, not more than twenty (20) persons shall be allowed in the mine at any one (1) time.

There shall be at least two (2) travelable passageways, to be designated as “escapeways”, from each working section to the surface, whether the mine openings are shafts, slopes, or drift. These shall be kept in safe condition for travel and reasonably free from standing water and other obstructions.

One (1) of the designated escapeways may be the haulage road.

One (1) of the escapeways must be ventilated with intake air.

At mines now operating with only one (1) free passageway to the surface, immediate action shall be taken to provide a second passageway.

Where the designated escapeways are shafts, they shall be equipped with hoist and cage or with travelable stairways or ladders.

No shaft more than thirty feet (30') deep, sunk after June 9, 1949, shall be equipped with ladders.

Stairways shall be of substantial construction, set at an angle not greater than forty-five degrees (45°) with the horizontal, and equipped on at least one (1) side with a suitable handrail.

Landing platforms shall be at least two feet (2') wide and four feet (4') long and shall be railed properly.

Ladders shall be anchored securely.

Where ladders or stairways set at an angle greater than forty-five degrees (45°) are now installed, their use may be continued, provided that they are of substantial construction, with platforms at intervals of not more than thirty feet (30') and equipped with a handrail in the case of stairways.

If a designated escapeway is a slope of not more than forty-five degrees (45°), it shall be equipped with a stairway or adequate walkway with cleats.

If the slope is more than forty-five degrees (45°), stairways shall be installed.

Direction signs shall be posted conspicuously to indicate manways and designated escapeways.

Good housekeeping shall be practiced underground.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 3, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., § 7262; Pope's Dig., § 9318; Acts 1949, No. 268, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-603.

11-7-305. Ventilation generally.

The owner, agent, or operator of every mine, whether operated by shaft, slope, or drift, shall provide and maintain for every mine a sufficient amount of ventilation, to be determined by the State Mine Inspector, not less than two hundred cubic feet (200 cu. ft.) of air per man per minute, measured at the foot of the downcast, which shall be circulated to the face of every working place throughout the mine, so that the mine shall be free of standing gas of whatsoever kind.

In all mines where firedamp is generated, every working place where firedamp is known to exist shall be examined every morning with a safety lamp by a competent person before any other persons are allowed to enter.

The ventilation required by this section may be produced by any suitable appliances.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 4, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., § 7263; Pope's Dig., § 9319; Acts 1949, No. 268, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-604.

11-7-306. Regulation of air currents.

Air regulation of all slopes, drifts, or shafts used for hoisting or hauling coal shall be made at the intake of air into the mine, except at the option of the owner or by direction of the State Mine Inspector, and all air that goes into the mine shall be so split that not more than fifty (50) employees will be working on each split of air, and not less than two hundred cubic feet (200 cu. ft.) of air per person shall pass each working face per minute, and the air shall be sufficient to dilute all noxious or explosive gases.

It shall be the duty of the mine inspector to measure the air at all working faces in making his or her inspection.

The machinery and appliances used for conducting or driving the air into the mines shall be so installed, arranged, and adjusted that the air currents may be easily and speedily reversed in emergencies.

History.

Acts 1905, No. 225, § 17, p. 567; 1919, No. 686, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 7284; Pope's Dig., § 9340; Acts 1949, No. 268, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-605; Acts 2019, No. 382, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “per person” for “per man” in (a).

11-7-307. Manner of working room and pillar plan mine.

The owner, agent, lessee, or operator of any coal mine in this state, if the mine is worked on the room and pillar plan, shall cause the work to be prosecuted in the mine in the following manner:

Two (2) entries parallel with each other must be driven for the ingress and egress of the air, and crosscuts must be made at intervals not to exceed forty feet (40') apart;

Where gas exists the crosscuts shall be driven thirty feet (30') apart or a crosscut shall be made at any other place ordered by the management;

No room shall be turned inside the last course cut.

The State Mine Inspector shall give notice in writing to the owner, agent, lessee, or operator in charge of each coal mine worked on the room and pillar plan, to conform to the requirements set out in subsection (a) of this section.

If the requirements are not complied with in the mines, then the owner, agent, lessee, or operator so failing shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day in which the mine is operated in violation of the above requirements.

History.

Acts 1905, No. 225, §§ 7, 8, p. 567; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7277, 7278; Pope's Dig., §§ 9333, 9334; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 52-607, 52-608.

11-7-308. Bore holes.

The owner, agent, or operator shall provide that a bore hole shall be kept twenty feet (20') in advance of the face of each and every working face and at a forty-five degree (45°) angle at intervals of eight feet (8') on each rib of the working face when driving toward an abandoned mine or parts of a mine suspected of containing inflammable gases or of being inundated with water.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 5, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., § 7264; Pope's Dig., § 9320; Acts 1949, No. 268, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-606.

11-7-309. Means of signaling — Cages.

The owner, agent, or operator of every mine operated by shaft shall provide suitable means for signaling between the bottom and top thereof.

He or she shall also provide safe means of hoisting and lowering persons in a cage covered with boiler iron, so as to keep safe, as far as possible, persons descending into or ascending out of the mine.

The cages shall be furnished with guides to conduct it through slides through the shaft with a sufficient brake on every drum to prevent accident in case of the giving out or breaking of the machinery.

The cage shall be furnished with spring catches, intended and provided so far as possible to prevent the consequences of cable breaking or the loosening or disconnecting of the machinery.

No props or rails shall be lowered in a cage in every case while men are descending into or ascending out of the mine.

When men are ascending or descending, the opposite cage in every case shall be empty.

No owner, agent, or operator of any coal mine operated by a shaft or slope shall place in charge of any engine whereby men are lowered into or hoisted out of the mines anyone but an experienced, competent, and sober person not under eighteen (18) years of age.

No person shall be permitted to ride upon a loaded cage or wagon used for hoisting purposes in any shaft or slope, except persons employed for that purpose.

In no case shall any coal be hoisted out of any mine while any person or persons are descending into the mine.

In no case shall more than one (1) member of the same family ascend or descend on a cage.

No more than eight (8) persons shall ascend out of or descend into any mine on one (1) cage at one (1) time, nor shall they be lowered or hoisted more rapidly than five hundred feet (500') to the minute.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, §§ 6, 7, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7265, 7266; Pope's Dig., §§ 9321, 9322; Acts 1949, No. 268, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 52-611, 52-612.

11-7-310. Gates, bonnets, and other safety measures.

The owner, agent, or operator shall cause every landing on a level or above the surface of the ground and the entrance to each intermediate vein to be securely fenced by a gate and a bonnet so prepared to cover and protect the shaft and the entrances thereto.

The entrance to every abandoned slope, air, or other shaft shall be securely fenced off.

Every steam boiler shall be provided with proper steam gauge, water gauge, and safety valve.

All underground self-acting or engine plains or gangways on which cars are drawn and persons allowed to travel shall be provided with some proper means of signaling between stopping places, and the end of the plains and gangways and sufficient places of refuge at the side of the plains or gangways shall be provided at intervals of not more than thirty feet (30') apart.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 8, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., § 7267; Pope's Dig., § 9323; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-613.

11-7-311. Prop timbers.

The owner, agent, or operator of any mine shall keep a sufficient amount of timber when required to be used as props, so that workmen can at all times be able to properly secure the workings from caving in. It shall be the duty of the owner, agent, or operator to send down all props when required and deliver the props to the place where cars are delivered. Timbering shall be done in a safe and workmanlike manner.

History.

Acts 1893, No. 125, § 14, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., § 7271; Pope's Dig., § 9327; Acts 1949, No. 268, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-614.

11-7-312. Medical and emergency supplies.

There shall be kept in the engine room or at some nearby and convenient place at each mine a supply of oils, bandages, blankets or covers for wraps, and a cot or stretcher for the use of and to be used by persons who may receive injuries in or at the mines.

The agent, owner, lessee, or operator shall also provide and maintain at some convenient place a conveyance in which to take from the mines to their place of abode persons who may be injured.

History.

Acts 1905, No. 225, § 12, p. 567; C. & M. Dig., § 7281; Pope's Dig., § 9337; A.S.A. 1947, § 52-615.